District of Columbia statutes.
29-413.01

Corporate records.

(a)

A nonprofit corporation shall keep as permanent records minutes of all meetings of its members, board of directors, and any designated body, a record of all actions taken by the members, board of directors, or members of a designated body without a meeting, and a record of all actions taken by a committee of the board of directors or a designated body on behalf of the corporation.

(b)

A nonprofit corporation shall maintain appropriate accounting records.

(c)

A membership corporation or its agent shall maintain a record of its members, in a form that permits preparation of a list of the names and addresses of all members, in alphabetical order by class, showing the number of votes each member is entitled to cast.

(d)

A nonprofit corporation shall maintain its records in written form or in any other form of a record.

(e)

A nonprofit corporation shall keep a copy of the following records at its principal office:

(1)

Its articles of incorporation or restated articles of incorporation and all amendments to them currently in effect;

(2)

Its bylaws or restated bylaws and all amendments to them currently in effect;

(3)

The minutes and records described in subsection (a) of this section for the past 3 years;

(4)

All communications in the form of a record to members generally within the past 3 years, including the financial statements furnished for the past 3 years under § 29-413.20;

(5)

A list of the names and business addresses of its current directors and officers; and

(6)

Its most recent biennial report delivered to the Mayor under § 29-102.11.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

This section is referenced in § 29-406.40 and § 29-413.02.

Section References